California, session 20252026, SB1423.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Climate change is intensifying wildfire, flood, drought, and sea level rise risks across California. Sound land use planning that accounts for these risks is essential to protect the lives, property, and fiscal health of Californians.(b) California has invested substantially in publicly available spatial data and planning tools to support land use decision making. The Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, in coordination with state agencies, maintains datasets and mapping tools that provide critical information on hazards, environmental resources, infrastructure, and land use conditions.(c) Standardizing and requiring the use of statewide spatial planning data will improve planning outcomes, make planning decisions and their outcomes more consistent with the state’s planning priorities, such as those specified in Section 65041.1 of the Government Code, promote transparency and consistency across regional planning agencies, plans and documents, reduce costs, promote efficiencies, and support more resilient and equitable communities.(d) Standardized spatial planning datasets are intended as tools to inform and guide future planning decisions. decisions and to support voluntary data-informed planning across state, regional, and local agencies.SEC. 2. Section 65040.18 is added to the Government Code, to read:65040.18. (a) For purposes of this section section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Centralized online platform” “Consolidated online platform” means a publicly accessible online portal maintained or designated by the office that provides access to standardized spatial planning datasets. datasets as a decision support tool.(2)“Regional planning agency” means a council of governments, metropolitan planning organization, or county authorized under state law to develop regional land use strategies, transportation plans, or infrastructure plans.(3)(2) “Standardized spatial planning dataset” means a geospatial data						layer layers that has have been compiled, standardized, and published by the office pursuant to this section.(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the office shall compile, standardize, maintain, and make publicly available through a centralized consolidated online platform a core set of statewide standardized spatial planning datasets.(c) The standardized spatial planning datasets shall include the following categories of information:(1) Hazard risk data, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) State and local responsibility area high and very high fire hazard severity zones as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(B) One hundred-year One-hundred-year and 500-year flood plains as designated by relevant state and federal agencies.(C) Coastal and inland areas subject to sea level rise inundation risk as identified by the Ocean Protection Council.(2) Natural resource sensitivity data, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Wetlands and riparian areas as mapped by relevant state and federal agencies.(B) Biological resource areas that contain, support, or are necessary to sustain important biological or ecological resources, including species biodiversity, significant habitats and wildlife corridors as determined by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Natural Resources Agency.(C) Legally protected lands and lands under a conservation easement.(3) Agricultural value data, including, but not limited to, both of the following:(A) Prime and unique farmlands and farmland of statewide and local importance as classified by the Department of Conservation.(B) Lands subject to Williamson Act contracts pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5.(d) On or before January 1, 2028, the office shall develop and publish provide guidance for regional planning agencies on methods and best practices for incorporating and documenting use of the agencies to inform them on how to use and integrate standardized spatial planning datasets in regional planning processes. processes and products.(e) The office shall update the standardized spatial planning datasets as new or revised data becomes available from the originating state or federal source agencies, but no less frequently than every three years.SEC. 3. Article 15 (commencing with Section 65770) is added to Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, to read: Article 15. Regional Use of Standardized Spatial Planning Documents65770.For purposes of this section, “regional planning agency” means a council of governments, metropolitan planning organization, or county authorized under state law to develop regional land use strategies, transportation plans, or infrastructure plans.65771.65770. (a) A regional planning agency that adopts or substantially amends a regional planning document on or after January 1, 2028, shall incorporate and use State, regional, and local governments may consider use of the standardized spatial planning datasets published by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation pursuant to Section 65040.18 when developing any of the following, as applicable: in the development and production of land use and infrastructure plans, including, but not limited to:(1)Regional land use strategies.(1) General plans pursuant to Section 65300.(2) Regional transportation plans and sustainable communities strategies prepared pursuant to Section 65080.(3)Regional infrastructure plans.(4)Any other applicable regional planning documents as determined by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation in consultation with regional planning agencies.(b)A regional planning agency shall, as part of the adoption or amendment of any regional planning document subject to subdivision (a), do all of the following:(1)Map and disclose how the standardized spatial planning datasets were used in the development of the planning document.(2)Identify areas of elevated hazard risk, natural resource sensitivity, or land use conflict based on the standardized spatial planning datasets.(3)Document how the identified areas of elevated risk, sensitivity, or conflict were considered in determining planning priorities and outcomes.(c)A regional planning agency shall apply a planning prioritization approach that does all of the following:(1)Prioritizes the avoidance of directing growth or significant new infrastructure into areas identified in the standardized spatial planning datasets as posing high hazard risk, significant natural resource sensitivity, or significant agricultural value, where feasible.(2)Encourages minimization of growth in areas identified by paragraph (1) where avoidance is determined not to be feasible.(3)Encourages and supports mitigation strategies.(3) Regional housing needs allocations processes pursuant to Section 65584.(4) Climate action plans.(d)(b) In addition to subdivision (a), a regional planning agency is encouraged to use other more precise, current, or stringent nothing in this section or in Section 65040.18 shall restrict agencies from using more precise or current data that are available at the regional or local level, including data developed through natural community conservation plans or other regional conservation initiatives, to inform and refine land use screening and planning planning processes or decisions.(c) Nothing in this section or in Section 65040.18 creates new regulatory requirements, regulates land use or zoning, establishes land use designations, or preempts the local land use authority of cities and counties.(e)(d) The Office of Land Use and Climate and Innovation shall provide technical assistance to a regional planning agency, upon request, to support compliance with this section. for use of data pursuant to this section upon request.65772.This article does not apply to the adoption or amendment of a regional planning document for a community with a density greater than 1 unit per acre or as otherwise determined by the Office of Land Use and Climate and Innovation.SEC. 4.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.